Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-806
Regional Radiation Health Center; duties.

In order to carry out the purposes for which it is established, the Regional Radiation Health Center shall: (1) Employ professional medical and allied health personnel for the diagnosis and treatment of radiation casualties; (2) acquire appropriate instrumentation and equipment to support the unique aspects of diagnosis and treatment of radiation injury; (3) develop specialized patient care facilities for initial receiving, evaluation, decontamination and emergency treatment of radiation casualties; (4) specialized patient care facilities for long-term inpatient management of radiation injury; and (5) any appropriate support facilities to assist the comprehensive management of radiation injury.

Any of the facilities and services provided for in subdivisions (1) to (5) of this section may be applied to the care and treatment of patients other than radiation casualties whenever not being fully utilized for radiation casualties.

Laws 1972, LB 1405, § 2.